North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
2014-67, s. 4, provides: “The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges, through the North Carolina Community College System Office, shall consult with the North Carolina National Guard Education and Employment Center, the North Carolina Department of Commerce, the North Carolina Department of Labor, and any other State or federal agencies as appropriate, to do the following: (i) study ‘Knowledge Gap Fulfillment,’ the continuation, development, and creation of programs that provide maximum credit for military training or experience that meet North Carolina licensing, certification, or credential standards; (ii) identify job development programs that require the same Military Occupational Skills (MOS) or share the same aptitude skills required to complete the program; (iii) identify existing Veterans Administration (VA) approved nondegree programs conducted in other states that have a high employment demand in North Carolina; (iv) determine the ability of State community colleges or other training centers to conduct these nondegree programs; and (v) identify and develop similar short-term programs that meet the needs of North Carolina-specific, high employment technical career fields. A consideration in all program studies in this section shall be VA-approved for educational benefits with the North Carolina State Approval Agency. The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the cochairs of the House Homeland Security, Military, and Veterans Affairs Committee, and the cochairs of the Legislative Research Commission Study Committee on Civilian Credit for Military Training and State Adjutant Selection Criteria with recommendations and any proposed legislation no later than December 15, 2014.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 11.7(a)-(h), as amended by Session Laws
2016-94, s. 11.2(a)-(d) provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that the six-year graduation rate for students pursuing a baccalaureate degree from any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina is too low. The General Assembly further finds that it is important to design and implement a program for the purpose of achieving the following goals: to assist more students to obtain a baccalaureate degree within a shorter time period; to provide students with a college education at significantly lower costs for both the student and the State; to help decrease the amount of debt resulting from loans that a student may owe upon graduation; to provide a student with an interim degree that may increase a student’s job opportunities if the student chooses not to continue postsecondary education; and to provide easier access to academic counseling that will assist a student in selecting coursework that reflects the student’s educational and career goals and helps the student succeed academically.

“(b) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall jointly study and evaluate how a deferred admission program, to be known as the North Carolina Guaranteed Admission Program (NCGAP), for students identified as academically at risk and designed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, would address the issues and help achieve the goals set out in subsection (a) of this section. In its study the Board of Governors and State Board of Community Colleges shall also consider the best procedure for implementing NCGAP and the fiscal impact it may have with respect to enrollment.

“By January 1, 2017, the President of The University of North Carolina, in consultation with the Board of Governors, shall adopt a plan to improve student completion of baccalaureate degrees that includes specific targets for each constituent institution’s completion rates and that is effective for the 2017-2018 academic year. For the purposes of this section, ‘completion rates‘ may include the four and six year graduation rate of first-time, full-time freshman or other methods of measuring completion that may more accurately capture the success of each institution’s undergraduate population. The plan shall allow for a variety of strategies designed to best meet the individual constituent institutions’ needs, such as, but not limited to: redesigned courses, early alerts systems, tutoring, degree mapping, and innovative merit-based completion incentives.

“(c) NCGAP shall be a deferred admission program that requires a student who satisfies the admission criteria of a constituent institution, but whose academic credentials are not as competitive as other students admitted to the institution, to enroll in a community college in this State and earn an associate degree prior to enrolling as a student at the constituent institution. A student who earns an associate degree from a community college in this State within three years from the date of the deferred acceptance is guaranteed admission at that constituent institution to complete the requirements for a baccalaureate degree. A constituent institution shall hold in reserve an enrollment slot in the appropriate future academic year for any student who accepts a deferred admission. A constituent institution shall also reduce its enrollment for each academic year by the number of deferred admissions granted for that academic year.

“(d) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall report their finding and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by March 1, 2016. The report shall include an analysis of the fiscal impact NCGAP may have with regard to enrollment at constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and at community colleges, the number of students who may participate in NCGAP, and its effect on FTEs.

“The President of the University of North Carolina shall report on the plan to improve student completions to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by January 1, 2017.

“(e) Based on the analysis conducted by the Board of Governors and the State Board of Community Colleges pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and the recommendations made pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, each constituent institution shall design a deferred admission program as part of NCGAP for implementation at the institution. The institution shall design the program so that it may be implemented at the institution beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year and applied to the institution’s admission process for the 2018-2019 academic year and each subsequent academic year if the plan required by subsection (b) of this section is not implemented.

“(f) The State Board of Community Colleges, in consultation with the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, shall adopt rules to ensure that a student participating in NCGAP is provided counseling and assistance in selecting coursework that reflects the student’s educational and career goals and that provides a smooth transition from the community college to the constituent institution.

“(g) NCGAP shall be implemented at all constituent institutions and all community colleges beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year and shall apply to admissions policies at each constituent institution and community college beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year and each subsequent academic year if the plan required by subsection (b) of this section is not implemented.

“(h) This section does not apply to the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics.”

Session Laws
2017-68, s. 1(a), provides: “The President of The University of North Carolina shall implement the University of North Carolina Undergraduate Degree Completion Improvement Plan, developed in accordance with Section 11.7 of S.L. 2015-241, as amended by Section 11.2 of S.L. 2016-94, and presented to the General Assembly on December 31, 2016, effective beginning with the 2017-2018 academic year.”

Session Laws
2017-68, s. 3(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall jointly consider and evaluate the feasibility of applying for and implementing the UTEACH program as part of the curricula offered by the University of North Carolina System.

“UTEACH is a model program originally developed by the University of Texas at Austin. It is designed as a secondary STEM (science, technology, engineering, and mathematics) teacher preparation program with the goal of attracting high-caliber students, experienced and successful master teachers, and tenure-track faculty who are interested in STEM education. The UTEACH program is a course of study that combines the requirements for rigorous STEM degrees and for secondary teaching certification without adding time or cost to four-year degrees.

“(b) In their evaluation of the UTEACH program, the President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors may consider the following:

“(1)
How the UTEACH program would match up with the curricula currently offered through the University of North Carolina System and what adjustments, if any, would be required for implementation of the UTEACH program.

“(2)
Which constituent institutions and which departments and programs at those institutions would participate and collaborate in the UTEACH program if it was implemented.

“(3)
The application process and time frame required to develop a UTEACH program tailored to fit within the curricula of the University of North Carolina System.

“(4)
The cost of implementing and maintaining a UTEACH program and the alternatives for financing the program.

“(5)
Any statutory amendments or other legislative action that would be needed for the implementation of a UTEACH program.

“(c) The President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by April 1, 2018, their findings and recommendations regarding the feasibility of applying for and implementing the UTEACH program as part of the curricula offered through the University of North Carolina System.”

“(6)
Any other issues the President, or the President’s designee, and the Board of Governors deem relevant in their evaluation of the UTEACH program.

Session Laws
2017-68, s. 2(a)-(c)
provides: “(a) By March 1, 2018, the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall develop an articulation agreement for the transfer of credits earned for an associate degree in an early childhood education program at a community college toward a baccalaureate degree in an early childhood education program at a constituent institution for the purposes of the student obtaining teacher licensure in the area of Birth through Kindergarten. The articulation agreement shall apply to all community college campuses and constituent institutions with early childhood education programs. The articulation agreement may include that the community college student transferring credit and enrolling in the constituent institution has a minimum grade point average and a minimum Praxis I score.

“(b) By April 15, 2018, the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the development of the articulation agreement and the plan for implementation of the articulation agreement at all community college campuses and constituent institutions with early childhood education programs. The systemwide articulation agreement for early childhood education programs entered into between The University of North Carolina and the Community College System shall apply beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year.

“(c) This section is effective when it becomes law [June 28, 2017].”